Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1316
State highway system; establishment, construction, maintenance; plans and specifications.

The department shall be responsible for the preparation and adoption of plans and specifications for the establishment, construction, and maintenance of the state highway system. Such plans and specifications may be amended, from time to time, as the department deems advisable. Such plans and specifications should conform, as closely as practicable, to those adopted by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 16, p. 424;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 1.